en: E943b, Isobutane
xx: E943b
bg: E943b, Изобутан
ca: E943b, Isobutà, isobuta
cs: E943b, Isobutan, 2-methylpropan, 2-metylpropan, Izobutan, Methylpropan, Izo-butan, Iso-butan, R-600a
da: E943b, Isobutan
de: E943b, Isobutan, Methylpropan, Iso-Butan
el: E943b, Ισοβουτανιο, Μεθυλοπροπάνιο, IPrMe, IBuH, Τριμεθυλομεθάνιο
es: E943b, Isobutano, Metilpropano, Isobutilo, 2-metilpropano
et: E943b, Isobutaan
fi: E943b, Isobutaani, 2-metyylipropaani, Isobutaania, 2-metyylipropaania
fr: E943b, Isobutane, 2-méthylpropane, R600a, 75-28-5, R 600a, Méthylpropane, Greenfreeze
hu: E943b, Izobután
it: E943b, Isobutano, 2-metilpropano, Metilpropano
lt: E943b, Izobutanas
lv: E943b, Izobutāns
mt: E943b, Isobutan
nl: E943b, Isobutaan, Methylpropaan
pl: E943b, Izobutan
pt: E943b, Isobutano, Metil propano, Iso-butano
ro: E943b, Izobutan
sk: E943b, Izobután, Metylpropán
sl: E943b, Izobutan
sv: E943b, Isobutan, Metylpropan, 2-metylpropan

en: E944, Propane
xx: E944
bg: E944, Пропан
ca: E944, Propà
cs: E944, Propan
da: E944, Propan
de: E944, Propan, Propangas
el: E944, Προπανιο, Μεθυλαιθύλιο, Διμεθυλομεθάνιο, EtMe, Μεθυλαιθάνιο
es: E944, Propano, Gas propano
et: E944, Propaan
fi: E944, Propaani, Propaanikaasu, Dimetyylimetaani, N-propaani, Metyylietaani, Propaania, Propaanikaasua, Dimetyylimetaania, N-propaania, Metyylietaania
fr: E944, Propane
hu: E944, Propán
it: E944, Propano
lt: E944, Propanas
lv: E944, Propāns
mt: E944, Propan
nl: E944, Propaan
pl: E944, Propan
pt: E944, Propano, Gás propano
ro: E944, Propan
ru: E944, Пропан, C3H8, Е944
sk: E944, Propán
sl: E944, Propan, Projekt:Propan
sv: E944, Propan, Isopropan, E 944

en: E945, chloropentafluoroethane
xx: E945
af: E945, chloorpentafluoroetaan
ar: E945, كلورو خماسي فلورو الإيثان
az: E945, xloropentafluoroetan
bg: E945, хлоропентафлуороетан
ca: E945, cloropentafluoroetà
cs: E945, chloropentafluorethan
da: E945, chlorpentafluorethan
de: E945, Chlorpentafluorethan, R 115, 1-Chlor-1\,1\,2\,2\,2-pentafluorethan, Pentafluorchlorethan, R115, Monochlorpentafluorethan
el: E945, χλωροπενταφθοροαιθάνιο
eo: E945, kloropentafluoroetano
es: E945, cloropentafluoroetano
et: E945, kloropentafluoroetaan
fi: E945, Klooripentafluorietaani, R115, CFC 115, Klooripentafluorietaania
fr: E945, Chloropentafluoroéthane, C2ClF5, R-115, R115, Chloropentafluoréthane, CFC 115, 76-15-3
he: E945, כלורופנטאפלואורואתאן
hi: E945, क्लोरोपेंटाफ्लोरोइथेन
hr: E945, kloropentafluoroetan
hu: E945, Kloropentafluoretán
id: E945, kloropentafluoroetana
it: E945, cloropentafluoroetano
ja: E945, クロロペンタフルオロエタン
ko: E945, 클로로펜타플루오로에탄
lt: E945, chlorpentafluoretanas
lv: E945, hloropentafluoretāns
mk: E945, хлоропентафлуороетан
mt: E945, kloropentafluoroetanu
nl: E945, Chloorpentafluorethaan, 1-chloor-1\,1\,2\,2\,2-pentafluorethaan
pl: E945, chloropentafluoroetan
pt: E945, cloropentafluoroetano
ro: E945, Cloropentafluoro-etan
ru: E945, хлорпентафторэтан
sk: E945, chlórpentafluóretán
sl: E945, kloropentafluoroetan
sq: E945, kloropentafluoroetan
sr: E945, хлоропентафлуороетан
sv: E945, kloropentafluoroetan
th: E945, คลอโรเพนตาฟลูออโรอีเทน
tr: E945, kloropentafloroetan
uk: E945, хлоропентафторетан
vi: E945, chloropentafluoroethane
zh: E945, 氯五氟乙烷

en: E946, octafluorocyclobutane
xx: E946
af: E946, oktafluorosiklobutaan
ar: E946, أوكتافلوروسيكلوبوتان
az: E946, oktaflorotsiklobutan
bg: E946, октафлуороциклобутан
ca: E946, octafluorociclobutà
cs: E946, oktafluorcyklobutan
da: E946, octafluorcyclobutan
de: E946, Octafluorcyclobutan, RC318
el: E946, οκταφθοροκυκλοβουτάνιο
eo: E946, oktafluorociklobutano
es: E946, octafluorociclobutano
et: E946, oktafluorotsüklobutaan
fi: E946, Oktafluorisyklobutaani, R-C318, C4F8, Oktafluorisyklobutaania
fr: E946, Octafluorocyclobutane, 115-25-3, C4F8, R-C318
hu: E946, oktafluor-ciklobután
it: E946, octafluorociclobutano
ja: E946, オクタフルオロシクロブタン
ko: E946, 옥타플루오로시클로부탄
lt: E946, oktafluorciklobutanas
lv: E946, oktafluorciklobutāns
mt: E946, octafluorocyclobutane
nl: E946, Octafluorcyclobutaan, Perfluorcyclobutaan, Freon C318
pl: E946, oktafluorocyklobutan
pt: E946, octafluorociclobutano
ro: E946, octafluorociclo-butan
ru: E946, октафлуороциклобутан
sk: E946, oktafluórcyklobután
sl: E946, oktafluorociklobutan
sv: E946, oktafluorcyklobutan
tr: E946, oktaflorosiklobutan
uk: E946, октафлуороциклобутан
zh: E946, 八氟环丁烷

en: E948, Oxygen, element 8
xx: E948
bg: E948, Кислород
ca: E948, Oxigen
cs: E948, Kyslík
da: E948, Oxygen, ilt
de: E948, Sauerstoff
el: E948, Οξυγονο
es: E948, Oxígeno
et: E948, Hapnik
fi: E948, Happi, Happea
fr: E948, Dioxygène, oxygène
hu: E948, Oxigén
it: E948, Ossigeno
lt: E948, Deguonis
lv: E948, Skābeklis
mt: E948, Ossiġnu, ossiġenu
nl: E948, Zuurstof
pl: E948, Tlen
pt: E948, Oxigénio, elemento 8
ro: E948, Oxigen
ru: E948, Кислород
sk: E948, Kyslík
sl: E948, Kisik
sv: E948, Syre

en: E949, Hydrogen
xx: E949
bg: E949, Водород
ca: E949, Hidrogen
cs: E949, Vodík
da: E949, Brint
de: E949, Wasserstoff
el: E949, Υδρογόνο
es: E949, Hidrógeno
et: E949, Vesinik
fi: E949, Vety, Vetyä
fr: E949, Hydrogène
hu: E949, Hidrogén
it: E949, Idrogeno
lt: E949, Vandenilis
lv: E949, Ūdeņradis
mt: E949, Idroġenu
nl: E949, Waterstof
pl: E949, Wodór
pt: E949, Hidrogénio
ro: E949, Hidrogen
ru: E949, Водород
sk: E949, Vodík
sl: E949, Vodik
sv: E949, Väte

en: E950, Acesulfame k, Acesulfame potassium
xx: E950
ar: E950, أسيسلفام البوتاسيوم
bg: E950, Ацесулфам к, Калиев ацесулфам
ca: E950, Acesulfam K, Acesulfame-k, acelsufame de potassi, acesulfam potàssic
cs: E950, Acesulfam k, Acesulfam draselný
da: E950, Acesulfamkalium, Acesulfamkalium, Acesulfam K
de: E950, Acesulfam-K
el: E950, Ακεσουλφαμη κ, Ακεσουλφάμη
eo: E950, Acesulfamo
es: E950, Acesulfamo K, Acesulfame K, Acesulfamo potásico, acesulfame potásico, acesulfamo, acelsufamo de potasio, acesulfamo de potasio, acesulfame de potasio
et: E950, Kaaliumatsesulfaam, Atsesulfaamkaalium, atsesulfaam-K
fa: E950, اسسولفام پتاسیم
fi: E950, Asesulfaami k, Asesulfaamikalium, Asesulfaamikaliumia
fr: E950, Acésulfame K, Acésulfame-K, acésulfame de potassium, Acésulfame potassium, sel de potassium de l'acésulfame, Ace K, Acesulfamo-k
gl: E950, Acesulfamo-k
he: E950, אצסולפאם-K
hr: E950, acesulfam-K
hu: E950, Aceszulfám k, Aceszulfám-kálium
id: E950, Asesulfam
it: E950, Acesulfame K, acesulfame potassico
ja: E950, アセスルファムカリウム, アセスルファムK, アセスルファムＫ
lt: E950, Acesulfamas k, Acesulfamo kalis
lv: E950, Acesulfāms k, Acesulfamkālijs
mt: E950, Aċesulfam k, Aċesulfam tal-potassju
nb: E950, Acesulfam K
nl: E950, Acesulfaam-k, Acesulfaam-kalium
pl: E950, Acesulfam k, Acesulfam potasu
pt: E950, Acessulfame k, Acessulfame de potássio, Acesulfame-K
ro: E950, Acesulfam k, Acesulfam de potasiu
ru: E950, ацесульфам
sh: E950, Kalijum acesulfam
sk: E950, Acesulfám k, Acesulfám draselný
sl: E950, Acesulfam k, acesulfam K, Kalijev acesulfam
sr: E950, acesulfam K
sv: E950, Acesulfam k, Acesulfame k, Acesulfamkalium
th: E950, แอซีซัลเฟมโพแทสเซียม, อะซิซัลแฟม-เค
uk: E950, Ацесульфам
vi: E950, Acesulfame K
zh: E950, 乙酰磺胺酸钾

en: E951, Aspartame, 1-Methyl N-L-alpha-aspartyl-L-phenylalanine, Asp-phe-ome, 3-Amino-N-(alpha-methoxycarbonylphenethyl) succinamic acid, 3-Amino-N-(α-carboxyphenethyl)succinamic acid N-methyl ester, L-Aspartyl-L-phenylalanine methyl ester, 1-methyl N-L-α-aspartyl-L-phenylalanate, Aspartylphenylalanine methyl ester, 3-Amino-N-(alpha-carboxyphenethyl)succinamic acid N-methyl ester, 3-Amino-N-(α-methoxycarbonylphenethyl) succinamic acid, 1-Methyl N-L-alpha-aspartyl-L-phenylalanate
xx: E951
ar: E951, أسبرتام
az: E951, Aspartam
be: E951, Аспартам
bg: E951, Аспартам, NutraSweet, Нутрасуит
ca: E951, Aspartam
cs: E951, Aspartam, NutraSweet
da: E951, Aspartam
de: E951, Aspartam, Canderel, Asphartam, NutraSweet
el: E951, Ασπαρταμη
es: E951, Aspartamo, Espartame, Aspartame
et: E951, Aspartaam
fa: E951, آسپارتام
fi: E951, Aspartaami, Aspartamiini, Aspartaamia, Aspartamiinia
fr: E951, Aspartame, APM, Aspartyl phenylalanine methyl ester, L-Aspartyl-L-phenylalaninemethyl ester, Aspartam, sirop d'aspartame, sirop aspartame
gl: E951, Aspartamo
he: E951, אספרטם
hr: E951, aspartam
hu: E951, Aszpartám
id: E951, Aspartam
is: E951, Aspartam
it: E951, Aspartame
ja: E951, アスパルテーム, アスパルテーム L-フェニルアラニン化合物, l-フェニルアラニン化合物
ko: E951, 아스파탐
lt: E951, Aspartamas
lv: E951, Aspartāms
ms: E951, Aspartam
mt: E951, Aspartam
nb: E951, Aspartam
nl: E951, Aspartaam
nn: E951, aspartam
pl: E951, Aspartam, NutraSweet
pt: E951, Aspartame, Aspartamo
ro: E951, Aspartam
ru: E951, аспартам
sh: E951, Aspartam
sk: E951, Aspartám
sl: E951, Aspartam
sr: E951, аспартам
sv: E951, Aspartam, NutraSweet
ta: E951, அஸ்பார்ட்டம்
th: E951, แอสปาร์แตม
tr: E951, Aspartam
uk: E951, Аспартам
vi: E951, Aspartame
zh: E951, 阿斯巴甜

en: E952, Cyclamic acid and its Na and Ca salts, Cyclamic acid, sodium cyclamate, cyclamates
xx: E952
bg: E952, цикламова киселина и нейните натриеви и калиеви соли i
ca: E952, Àcid ciclàmic i les seves sals de sodi i calci
cs: E952, Kyselina cyklamová a její sodná a vápenatá sůl
da: E952, Cyclaminsyre samt na- og ca-salte deraf
de: E952, Cyclamat, Cyclaminsäure, Cyclohexylsulfaminsäure, N-Cyclohexylsulfaminsäure
el: E952, Κυκλαμικο οξυ και τα αλατα του με νατριο και ασβεστιο, Κυκλαμικό οξύ
eo: E952, Ciklamato
es: E952, Ciclamato, Ciclamatos, Ácido ciclámico y sus sales de sodio y calcio, ciclamato sodico
et: E952, Tsüklamiinhape ning selle naatrium- ja kaltsiumsoolad i
eu: E952, ziklamato
fi: E952, Syklamaatti, Syklamaatit, Syklaamihappo, Kalsiumsyklamaatti, Natriumsyklamaatti, Syklamaattia, Syklamaatteja, Syklaamihappoa, Kalsiumsyklamaattia, Natriumsyklamaattia
fr: E952, Acide cyclamique et ses sels, cyclamates, Acide cyclamique, Cyclamate de calcium, Cyclamate de potassium, Cyclamate de sodium, Acide cyclamique et ses sels de na et de ca
ga: E952, Cioglamáit
gl: E952, Ciclamato
he: E952, ציקלמאט
hr: E952, natrijev ciklamat, ciklamati
hu: E952, Ciklaminsav, valamint Na- és Ca-sói , ciklaminsav és ciklamátok, ciklaminsav, ciklamátok, nátrium-ciklamát, calcium-ciklamát
it: E952, Acido ciclamico e suoi sali di sodio e di calcio, Acido ciclamico, Ciclamato, Ciclammato, Ciclamato di sodio, Ciclamato di calcio, sodio ciclamato
ja: E952, チクロ
lt: E952, Ciklamo rūgštis ir jos na bei ca druskos
lv: E952, ciklāmskābe un tās na un ca sāļi
mt: E952, aċidu ċiklamiku u l-imlieħ tiegħu na u ca (i)
nb: E952, syklamat
nl: E952, Cyclaamzuur en het natrium- en calciumzout daarvan, Cyclaamzuur
pl: E952, Kwas cyklaminowy i jego sole: potasowa i wapniowa, Cyklaminiany
pt: E952, ácido ciclâmico e seus sais de sódio e cálcio, Ciclamato
ro: E952, Acid ciclamic și sărurile sale de na și ca
ru: E952, Цикламат
sk: E952, Kyselina cyklámová a jej na a ca soli
sl: E952, Ciklamna kislina ter njene natrijeve in kalcijeve soli (i)
sv: E952, Cyklaminsyra och dess na- och ca-salter, Cyklaminsyra
tr: E952, Siklamat
zh: E952, 甜蜜素

en: E952(i)
xx: E952(i)

en: E952(ii), Calcium cyclamate
xx: E952(ii)

en: E952(iv)
xx: E952(iv)

en: E953, isomalt
xx: E953
af: E953, Isomalt
ar: E953, إسومالت
bg: E953, Изомалт
ca: E953, Isomalt
cs: E953, Isomalt
da: E953, Isomalt
de: E953, Isomalt
el: E953, ισομάλτ
es: E953, isomalt
et: E953, Isomalt
fa: E953, ایزومالت
fi: E953, isomalti, isomaltitoli, isomaltia, isomaltitolia
fr: E953, isomalt
ga: E953, iseamalt
gl: E953, Isomalt
hr: E953, izomalt
hu: E953, Izomalt
it: E953, isomalto
ja: E953, イソマルト
lt: E953, Izomaltas
lv: E953, Izomalts
mt: E953, Isomalt
nb: E953, Isomalt
nl: E953, Isomalt
pl: E953, Isomalt, Izomalt
pt: E953, Isomalte
ro: E953, Izomalt, isomalt
ru: E953, изомальтит
sh: E953, Izomalt
sk: E953, Izomalt
sl: E953, Izomalt
sr: E953, изомалт
sv: E953, isomalt
tr: E953, Izomalt
uk: E953, Ізомальт
zh: E953, 異麥芽酮糖醇

en: E954, saccharin and its salts, saccharin, saccharin sodium salt, saccharin sodium, sodium saccharin salt, saccharin calcium salt, saccharin calcium, calcium saccharine, saccharin potassium salt, saccharine potassium, potassium saccharine, sodium saccharin
xx: E954
ar: E954, سكارين
be: E954, сахарын
bg: E954, захарин и неговите натриеви, калиеви и калциеви соли, захарин
bn: E954, স্যাকারিন
ca: E954, sacarina i les seves sals de sodi potassi i calci, sacarina
cs: E954, sacharin a jeho sodná draselná a vápenatá sůl, sacharin, cukerín, zuckerin
da: E954, saccharin and its na. k and ca salts, sakkarin, saccharin
de: E954, Saccharin, Benzoesäuresulfimid, Natriumsaccharin, Saccharin-Natrium
el: E954, σακχαρινες
eo: E954, sakarino
es: E954, sacarina, Sacarina y sus sales de sodio potasio y calcio, sacarinas, sacarina sódica
et: E954, Sahhariin ning selle naatrium- kaalium- ja kaltsiumsoolad, sahhariin
eu: E954, sakarina
fa: E954, ساخارین
fi: E954, sakariini, sakkariini, natriumsakariini, kaliumsakariini, kalsiumsakariini, Sakariinia, sakkariinia, natriumsakariinia, kaliumsakariinia, kalsiumsakariinia
fr: E954, Saccharine et ses sels, saccharinates, saccharine, Saccharine de calcium, Saccharine de potassium, Saccharine de sodium, sels de Saccharine, saccharinate de calcium, saccharinate de potassium, saccharinate de sodium, Sulphimide benzoïque, Saccharine et ses sels de na, k et ca, 6155-57-3, 10332-51-1, Saccharinate, 81-07-2, 6381-91-5, , 128-44-9, 6485-34-3, Saccarine
ga: E954, siúicrín
gl: E954, sacarina
he: E954, סכרין
hi: E954, सेकेरिन
hr: E954, saharin, saharini, natrijev saharin, natrijev saharinat
hu: E954, szacharin, valamint Na-, K- és Ca-sói 1, szaharin
hy: E954, սախարին
id: E954, sakarin
io: E954, sakarino
it: E954, Saccarina e suoi sali na k e ca, saccarina, saccarina di sodio
ja: E954, サッカリン
ko: E954, 사카린
ky: E954, сахарин
lt: E954, Sacharinas ir jo na k ir ca druskos, sacharinas
lv: E954, Saccharin and its na. k and ca salts, saccharin
mi: E954, āwenewene
mk: E954, сахарин
mt: E954, Saccharin and its na. k and ca salts, saccharin
nb: E954, sakkarin
nl: E954, Sacharine en het natrium- kalium- en calciumzout daarvan, Sacharine, Saccharine
pl: E954, Sacharyna i jej sole: sodowa potasowa i wapniowa, sacharyna, Sacharynian sodu, sacharyny
pt: E954, Sacarina e seus sais de sódio potássio e cálcio, sacarina
ro: E954, Saccharin and its na. k and ca salts, zaharină
ru: E954, сахарин, Натрия сахаринат
sh: E954, saharin
sk: E954, Sacharín a jeho soli na k a ca, sacharín
sl: E954, Saharin in njegove natrijeve kalijeve in kalcijeve soli, saharin
sr: E954, сахарин
sv: E954, sackarin, sackarinat, sackarinater, natriumsackarin
ta: E954, சாக்கரின்
th: E954, แซกคารีน
tr: E954, sakarin
uk: E954, сахарин
vi: E954, saccharin
zh: E954, 糖精

en: E954(i)
xx: E954(i)

en: E954(ii), Calcium saccharin
xx: E954(ii)

en: E954(iii), Potassium saccharin
xx: E954(iii)

en: E954(iv)
xx: E954(iv)

en: E955, Sucralose
xx: E955
bg: E955, Сукралоза
ca: E955, Sucralosa
cs: E955, Sukralosa, Sukralóza
da: E955, Sucralose, Sukralose
de: E955, Sucralose, Trichlorgalactosaccharose, Sukralose, E 955, Splenda
el: E955, Σουκραλοζη
es: E955, Sucralosa, Splenda
et: E955, Sukraloos
fi: E955, Sukraloosi, E 955, Sukraloosia
fr: E955, Sucralose, C12H19Cl3O8, E-955, 56038-13-2, Trichlorosucrose
hr: E955, sukraloza
hu: E955, Szukralóz
it: E955, Sucralosio, C12H19Cl3O8
ja: E955, スクラロース
lt: E955, Sukralozė
lv: E955, Sukraloze
mt: E955, Sukralożju
nl: E955, Sucralose
pl: E955, Sukraloza, Splenda
pt: E955, Sucralose
ro: E955, Sucraloză
ru: E955, Сукралоза, подсластитель-сукралоза, подсластитель сукралоза
sk: E955, Sukralóza
sl: E955, Sukraloza
sv: E955, Sukralos, Sucralose, E 955, Splenda
th: E955, ซูคราโลส

en: E956, Alitame
xx: E956
ar: E956, أليتام
az: E956, Alitam
bg: E956, Алитам
ca: E956, Alitam
cs: E956, Alitam
da: E956, Alitam
de: E956, Alitam, Alitame
el: E956, Αλιτάμη
eo: E956, Alitamo
es: E956, Alitamo
et: E956, Alitaam
fa: E956, آلیتام
fi: E956, Alitaami, Alitaamia
fr: E956, Alitame, 80863-62-3, C14H25N3O4S, 99016-42-9
he: E956, אליטאם
hi: E956, अलीटेम
hr: E956, Alitam
hu: E956, Alitám
id: E956, Alitam
it: E956, Alitame
ja: E956, アリテーム
ko: E956, 알리탐
lt: E956, Alitamas, Aclame
lv: E956, Alitāms
mk: E956, Алитам
ms: E956, Alitam
mt: E956, Alitam
nl: E956, Alitame
pl: E956, Alitam
pt: E956, Alitame
ro: E956, Alitam
ru: E956, Алитам
sk: E956, Alitam
sl: E956, Alitam
sq: E956, Alitam
sr: E956, Алитам
sv: E956, Alitam, E 956
th: E956, อะลิเทม
tr: E956, Alitam
uk: E956, Алітам
vi: E956, Alitam
zh: E956, 阿力甜